static/hunspell/05.11.2023/udm.aff
FLAG long
SFX N1 Y 673 # основное склонение
SFX N1 0 э/G1 [дзлнстую] #ед.ч.
SFX N1 0 е/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 ь е/G1 ь
SFX N1 й е/G1 й
SFX N1 0 эд/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 ед/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 ь ед/G1 ь
SFX N1 й ед/G1 й
SFX N1 0 эз/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 ез/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 ь ез/G1 ь
SFX N1 й ез/G1 й
SFX N1 0 мы/G1 .
SFX N1 0 ты/G1 [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N1 0 ды/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N1 0 ты/G1 [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 0 ды/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 с сы/G1 сс
SFX N1 0 сы/G1 [^с]с
SFX N1 0 сы/G1 [пфктшхцчщӵ]
SFX N1 0 зы/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N1 0 сы/G1 [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 0 зы/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 0 ме/G1 . # 1 лицо вин.п.
SFX N1 0 мес/G1 .
SFX N1 0 тэ/G1 [пфктсшхцчщӵ] # 2 л.
SFX N1 0 дэ/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N1 0 тэ/G1 [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 0 дэ/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 0 тэс/G1 [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N1 0 дэс/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N1 0 тэс/G1 [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 0 дэс/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 с сэ/G1 сс
SFX N1 0 сэ/G1 [^с]с
SFX N1 0 сэ/G1 [пфктшхцчщӵ] #3л.
SFX N1 0 зэ/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N1 0 сэ/G1 [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 0 зэ/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 с сэс/G1 сс
SFX N1 0 сэс/G1 [^с]с
SFX N1 0 сэс/G1 [пфктшхцчщӵ]
SFX N1 0 зэс/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N1 0 сэс/G1 [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 0 зэс/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 0 лэн/G1 . # род.п.
SFX N1 0 лэнлэсь/G1 .
SFX N1 0 лэнлы/G1 .
SFX N1 0 лэнэн/G1 .
SFX N1 0 элэн/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 эдлэн/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 эзлэн/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 елэн/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 0 едлэн/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 0 езлэн/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 ь елэн/G1 ь
SFX N1 й елэн/G1 й
SFX N1 ь едлэн/G1 ь
SFX N1 й едлэн/G1 й
SFX N1 ь езлэн/G1 ь
SFX N1 й езлэн/G1 й
SFX N1 0 мылэн/G1 .
SFX N1 0 тылэн/G1 [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N1 0 дылэн/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N1 0 тылэн/G1 [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 0 дылэн/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 с сылэн/G1 сс
SFX N1 0 сылэн/G1 [^с]с
SFX N1 0 сылэн/G1 [пфктшхцчщӵ]
SFX N1 0 зылэн/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N1 0 сылэн/G1 [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 0 зылэн/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 0 лэсь/G1 . # разд.п.
SFX N1 0 лэсьсэ/G1 .
SFX N1 0 элэсь/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 эдлэсь/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 эзлэсь/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 елэсь/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 0 едлэсь/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 0 езлэсь/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 ь елэсь/G1 ь
SFX N1 й елэсь/G1 й
SFX N1 ь едлэсь/G1 ь
SFX N1 й едлэсь/G1 й
SFX N1 ь езлэсь/G1 ь
SFX N1 й езлэсь/G1 й
SFX N1 0 мылэсь/G1 .
SFX N1 0 тылэсь/G1 [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N1 0 дылэсь/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N1 0 тылэсь/G1 [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 0 дылэсь/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 с сылэсь/G1 сс
SFX N1 0 сылэсь/G1 [^с]с
SFX N1 0 сылэсь/G1 [пфктшхцчщӵ]
SFX N1 0 зылэсь/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N1 0 сылэсь/G1 [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 0 зылэсь/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 0 лы/G1 . # дат.п.
SFX N1 0 элы/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 эдлы/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 эзлы/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 елы/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 0 едлы/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 0 езлы/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 ь елы/G1 ь
SFX N1 й елы/G1 й
SFX N1 ь едлы/G1 ь
SFX N1 й едлы/G1 й
SFX N1 ь езлы/G1 ь
SFX N1 й езлы/G1 й
SFX N1 0 мылы/G1 .
SFX N1 0 тылы/G1 [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N1 0 дылы/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N1 0 тылы/G1 [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 0 дылы/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 с сылы/G1 сс
SFX N1 0 сылы/G1 [^с]с
SFX N1 0 сылы/G1 [пфктшхцчщӵ]
SFX N1 0 зылы/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N1 0 сылы/G1 [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 0 зылы/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 0 тэк/G1 . #лиш.п.
SFX N1 0 этэк/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 эдтэк/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 эзтэк/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 етэк/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 0 едтэк/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 0 езтэк/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 ь етэк/G1 ь
SFX N1 й етэк/G1 й
SFX N1 ь едтэк/G1 ь
SFX N1 й едтэк/G1 й
SFX N1 ь езтэк/G1 ь
SFX N1 й езтэк/G1 й
SFX N1 0 мытэк/G1 .
SFX N1 0 тытэк/G1 [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N1 0 дытэк/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N1 0 тытэк/G1 [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 0 дытэк/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 с сытэк/G1 сс
SFX N1 0 сытэк/G1 [^с]с
SFX N1 0 сытэк/G1 [пфктшхцчщӵ]
SFX N1 0 зытэк/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N1 0 сытэк/G1 [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 0 зытэк/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 0 ъя/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьй] #соотв.п.
SFX N1 0 ъям/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьй]
SFX N1 0 ъяд/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьй]
SFX N1 0 ъяз/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьй]
SFX N1 0 ъямы/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьй]
SFX N1 0 ъяды/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьй]
SFX N1 0 ъязы/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьй]
SFX N1 0 я/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьй]
SFX N1 0 ям/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьй]
SFX N1 0 яд/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьй]
SFX N1 0 яз/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьй]
SFX N1 0 ямы/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьй]
SFX N1 0 яды/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьй]
SFX N1 0 язы/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьй]
SFX N1 0 эя/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 эдъя/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 эзъя/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 ея/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 0 едъя/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 0 езъя/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 ь ея/G1 ь
SFX N1 й ея/G1 й
SFX N1 ь едъя/G1 ь
SFX N1 й едъя/G1 й
SFX N1 ь езъя/G1 ь
SFX N1 й езъя/G1 й
SFX N1 0 мыя/G1 .
SFX N1 0 тыя/G1 [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N1 0 дыя/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N1 0 тыя/G1 [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 0 дыя/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 с сыя/G1 сс
SFX N1 0 сыя/G1 [^с]с
SFX N1 0 сыя/G1 [пфктшхцчщӵ]
SFX N1 0 зыя/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N1 0 сыя/G1 [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 0 зыя/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N1 0 эн/G1 [дзлнстую] #твор.п.
SFX N1 0 ен/G1 [^дзлнстуюь]
SFX N1 ь ен/G1 ь
SFX N1 й ен/G1 й
SFX N1 0 эным/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 эныд/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 эныз/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 еным/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 0 еныд/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 0 еныз/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 й еным/G1 й
SFX N1 й еныд/G1 й
SFX N1 й еныз/G1 й
SFX N1 ь еным/G1 ь
SFX N1 ь еныд/G1 ь
SFX N1 ь еныз/G1 ь
SFX N1 0 энымы/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 эныды/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 энызы/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 енымы/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 0 еныды/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 0 енызы/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 й енымы/G1 й
SFX N1 й еныды/G1 й
SFX N1 й енызы/G1 й
SFX N1 ь енымы/G1 ь
SFX N1 ь еныды/G1 ь
SFX N1 ь енызы/G1 ь
SFX N1 0 ын/G1 . #местн.п. + входн.п.
SFX N1 0 ынлэсь/G1 .
SFX N1 0 ам/G1 [^ьйеыаоэяиӧӥё]
SFX N1 0 амы/G1 [^ьйеыаоэяиӧӥё]
SFX N1 0 ад/G1 [^ьйеыаоэяиӧӥё]
SFX N1 0 ады/G1 [^йьеыаоэяиӧӥё]
SFX N1 0 аз/G1 [^ьйеыаоэяиӧӥё]
SFX N1 0 азы/G1 [^ьйеыаоэяиӧӥё]
SFX N1 0 ям/G1 [еыаоэяиӧӥё]
SFX N1 0 ямы/G1 [еыаоэяиӧӥё]
SFX N1 0 яд/G1 [еыаоэяиӧӥё]
SFX N1 0 яды/G1 [еыаоэяиӧӥё]
SFX N1 0 яз/G1 [еыаоэяиӧӥё]
SFX N1 0 язы/G1 [еыаоэяиӧӥё]
SFX N1 ь ям/G1 ь
SFX N1 й ям/G1 й
SFX N1 ь ямы/G1 ь
SFX N1 й ямы/G1 й
SFX N1 ь яд/G1 ь
SFX N1 й яд/G1 й
SFX N1 ь яды/G1 ь
SFX N1 й яды/G1 й
SFX N1 ь яз/G1 ь
SFX N1 й яз/G1 й
SFX N1 ь язы/G1 ь
SFX N1 й язы/G1 й
SFX N1 0 ысь/G1N1 . #исходн.п.
SFX N1 0 ысьтым/G1 .
SFX N1 0 ысьтымы/G1 .
SFX N1 0 ысьтыд/G1 .
SFX N1 0 ысьтыды/G1 .
SFX N1 0 ысьтыз/G1 .
SFX N1 0 ысьтызы/G1 .
SFX N1 0 ысьсэ/G1 . #-ысьсэ
SFX N1 0 ысен/G1 . #отдал.п.
SFX N1 0 ысеным/G1 .
SFX N1 0 ысенымы/G1 .
SFX N1 0 ысеныд/G1 .
SFX N1 0 ысеныды/G1 .
SFX N1 0 ысеныз/G1 .
SFX N1 0 ысенызы/G1 .
SFX N1 0 ысез/G1 . #-ысез
SFX N1 0 этӥ/G1 [дзлнстую] #перех.п.
SFX N1 0 этӥм/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 этӥмы/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 этӥд/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 этӥды/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 этӥз/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 этӥзы/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 етӥ/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 0 етӥм/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 0 етӥмы/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 0 етӥд/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 0 етӥды/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 0 етӥз/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 0 етӥзы/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 ь етӥ/G1 ь
SFX N1 й етӥ/G1 й
SFX N1 ь етӥм/G1 ь
SFX N1 й етӥм/G1 й
SFX N1 ь етӥмы/G1 ь
SFX N1 й етӥмы/G1 й
SFX N1 ь етӥд/G1 ь
SFX N1 й етӥд/G1 й
SFX N1 ь етӥды/G1 ь
SFX N1 й етӥды/G1 й
SFX N1 ь етӥз/G1 ь
SFX N1 й етӥз/G1 й
SFX N1 ь етӥзы/G1 ь
SFX N1 й етӥзы/G1 й
SFX N1 0 тӥ/G1 .
SFX N1 0 тӥм/G1 .
SFX N1 0 тӥмы/G1 .
SFX N1 0 тӥд/G1 .
SFX N1 0 тӥды/G1 .
SFX N1 0 тӥз/G1 .
SFX N1 0 тӥзы/G1 .
SFX N1 0 лань/G1 . #направ.п.
SFX N1 0 элань/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 эдлань/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 эзлань/G1 [дзлнстую]
SFX N1 0 елань/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 0 едлань/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 0 езлань/G1 [^дзлнстуюьй]
SFX N1 ь елань/G1 ь
SFX N1 й елань/G1 й
SFX N1 ь едлань/G1 ь
SFX N1 й едлань/G1 й
SFX N1 ь езлань/G1 ь
SFX N1 й езлань/G1 й
SFX N1 0 мылань/G1 .
SFX N1 0 тылань/G1 [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N1 0 дылань/G1 [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N1 0 тылань/G1 [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
