static/hunspell/05.11.2023/udm.dic
горд-горд/A1N1
гизё/A1N1
ӵуж-вож/A1N1
качыё/A1N1
бӧрысетӥ/A1N1
гыргам/A1N1
аръем/A1N1
шаратэм/A1N1
кипалтэм/A1N1
ошместэм/A1N1
вислуисьтэм/A1N1
гордо/A1N1
тазалыко/A1N1
куюко/A1N1
андано/A1N1
ужпӧро/A1N1
мускусо/A1N1
писо-пуо/A1N1
ӟарытпыр/A1N1
узыльмес/A1N1
зумырес/A1N1
ӝомыталэс/A1N1
люкыт/A1N1
йӧнлы/A1N1
мамыкесь/A1N1
суэсь/A1N1
аспӧрмосо/A1N1# С.М.
мурос/A1N1# Маша
акцизной/A1N1R1
биологической/A1N1R1
военно-дирижерской/A1N1R1
глянцевой/A1N1R1
дневной/A1N1R1
зрительной/A1N1R1
карликовой/A1N1R1
координационной/A1N1R1
ликвидационной/A1N1R1
межотраслевой/A1N1R1
наглой/A1N1R1
нотной/A1N1R1
опытно-показательной/A1N1R1
первосортной/A1N1R1
полигамной/A1N1R1
причастной/A1N1R1
разреженной/A1N1R1
сатирической/A1N1R1
сорокой/A1N1R1
телепатической/A1N1R1
уездной/A1N1R1
хищнической/A1N1R1
экономической/A1N1R1
япылак/D1A1N1
Аксион/J1N1
Газпром-сити/J1N1
Заря/J1N1
Комимелководхозпроект/J1N1
Мидл/J1N1
ПечорНИПИнефть/J1N1
Русфинанс/J1N1
Сыктывкархлеб/J1N1
Ухтажилстройпроект/J1N1
Бытремстройтрес/J1N1
лампатаба/N1
кирза/N1
сорока/N1
падмасяська/N1
перла/N1
папа/N1
айрата/N1
парча/N1
шег/N1
юг/N1
киярпуд/N1
пенсне/N1
изогож/N1
урыж/N1
шӧмыз-ческытэз/N1
ягконьыгуби/N1
гындали/N1
погыли/N1
кораськонни/N1
писэйпи/N1
зури/N1
тамакчи/N1
улосчи/N1
биагай/N1
кырчабей/N1
бадӟымуй/N1
баблескучкылак/N1
кышнек/N1
жобок/N1
кортсырк/N1
тэглык/N1
шӧдонлык/N1
калмык/N1
кӧртчал/N1
титул/N1
ватсанкыл/N1
ас-утем/N1
пурултэм/N1
ӟан/N1
шлан/N1
исьнеран/N1
дараптан/N1
кыллён/N1
ломдон/N1
мыльӟон/N1
возьытскон/N1
сульпаськон/N1
кесиськон/N1
эстӥськон/N1
шугъяськон/N1
гольтыръяськон/N1
азылон/N1
погыльскылон/N1
ишкиськылон/N1
пӧяськылон/N1
чалмылон/N1
вожатылон/N1
лыктылон/N1
коттылон/N1
пельтылон/N1
йырусыкмон/N1
зарланон/N1
жальгатон/N1
чырсатон/N1
шӧйӟектон/N1
ӵӧжпырпотон/N1
коттон/N1
пыльккытон/N1
косъяськытон/N1
пылатытон/N1
сисьтон/N1
кӧчон/N1
сезьыйыротурын/N1
кортӵогаллян/N1
пӧйшураллян/N1
муяллян/N1
тугекъян/N1
лӧскатъян/N1
ӝажыян/N1
бӧдено/N1
шоркусып/N1
шундыкенер/N1
избур/N1
виръюисьнумыр/N1
кыӵес/N1
кивалтос/N1
кункат/N1
быртует/N1
таба-табапурт/N1
поромытэт/N1
замлагач/N1
кокыш/N1
писэйкӧжы/N1
кайдырлы/N1
чечывичы/N1
куакаэмезь/N1
пашинь/N1
келись/N1
ыргонсӥть/N1
эсэпрадлык/N1U2
серембур/N1U2
пияшко/N1# Маша
асбам/N1# С.М. (-ы)
вискусып/N1# С.М.
автодоилка/N1R1
анафора/N1R1
балерун/N1R1
блоксхема/N1R1
валет/N1R1
военачальник/N1R1
генералиссимус/N1R1
госбезопастность/N1R1
действенность/N1R1
донник/N1R1
забастовщик/N1R1
золота/N1R1
кавалер/N1R1
кимвал/N1R1
колонка/N1R1
косоворотка/N1R1
лагохилус/N1R1
лонган/N1R1
медикамент/N1R1
мойва/N1R1
накипь/N1R1
новожён/N1R1
оплошка/N1R1
папаша/N1R1
переработка/N1R1
плут/N1R1
половник/N1R1
пресс-служба/N1R1
протуберанц/N1R1
разводна/N1R1
решительность/N1R1
сварка/N1R1
ситец/N1R1
сорочка/N1R1
стерлядь/N1R1
тайнопись/N1R1
тонно-километр/N1R1
угодье/N1R1
физфак/N1R1
хлюпик/N1R1
числитель/N1R1
эзотерика/N1R1
этногенез/N1R1
акароз/N1R2
аноним/N1R2
ассюре/N1R2
бенефиций/N1R2
брюмер/N1R2
вокализ/N1R2
гетеропластика/N1R2
графоспазм/N1R2
дзанни/N1R2
жардиньерка/N1R2
интерьер/N1R2
кариотип/N1R2
код/N1R2
кортес/N1R2
лаццарони/N1R2
макрофаг/N1R2
миелин/N1R2
набла/N1R2
олеус/N1R2
парапроктит/N1R2
пиролюзит/N1R2
пресс-секретарь/N1R2
рапира/N1R2
рубато/N1R2
синдикализм/N1R2
старт/N1R2
танбур/N1R2
триба/N1R2
феллодерма/N1R2
фототрансформатор/N1R2
центурион/N1R2
штандарт/N1R2
эпентеза/N1R2
одул/N1R3
Ӝуйлуд/T1N1
Сюмсивыселка/T1N1
Берлуд/T1N1
Ошмесвай/T1N1
Салкым/T1N1
Трактор/T1N1
Мыркошмес/T1N1
Петух/T1N1
Язок/T1N1
Старомихайловской/T2N1
Аа/T3N1
Антофагаста/T3N1
Банзарэ/T3N1
Богородский/T3N1
Васильсурск/T3N1
Вьенна/T3N1
Гуандун/T3N1
Докшукино/T3N1
Занзибар/T3N1
Йенчу-Огуз/T3N1
Касторное/T3N1
Кокшайка/T3N1
Ксениевский/T3N1
Лесогорский/T3N1
Малосалаирка/T3N1
Могилев-Подольский/T3N1
Нево/T3N1
Нягыньеган/T3N1
Панама/T3N1
Полевая/T3N1
Ратманова/T3N1
Сан-Франциско-де-Куэльяр/T3N1
Славков/T3N1
Суоменлинна/T3N1
Тисуль/T3N1
Умсей/T3N1
Хадыженск/T3N1
Чанъань/T3N1
Шексна/T3N1
Яблоновка/T3N1
Тарнополь/T3N1
баренцово/T7N1
кроноцкой/T7N1
ташкентской/T7N1
